praksid/praks4/maris-kodutöö/maris4.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

+N                ! Nimisõna
+A                ! Omadussõna
+Sg
+Pl
+Nom
+Gen
+Part
+Ill
+In
+El
+All              ! Alaleütlev
+Ad                 
+Abl
+Tr
+Term
+Es
+Abes
+Kom

! tuletus
+Der/m
+Der/im
+Der/lt
+Der/lik
+Comp             ! komparatiiv
+Super            ! Superlatiiv

%>                ! morfeemi piir
%{NA%}            ! nõrk aste

G1                ! g või null
B1                ! b või null
D1                ! d või null
S1                ! s või null
K1
K2
P1
P2
T1
T2
GK


LEXICON Root

kati+N:kati tüüp_pere ;    ! leksikaalne pool : pindesitus
karu+N:karu tüüp_ema ;
võru+N:võru tüüp_ema ;
käbi+N:käbi tüüp_ema ;
täpp+N:täpP1 tüüp_täpp ;
kott+N:kotT1 tüüp_täpp ;
rida+N:riD1a tüüp_ema ;
süsi+N:süS1 tüüp_käsi ;
vokk+N:vokK1 tüüp_täpp ;
kurk+N:kurK2 tüüp_täpp ;
tugi+N:tuG1 tüüp_tugi ;
prügi+N:prügi tüüp_ema ;
nimi+N:nim tüüp_tugi ;      
paat+N:paaT2 tüüp_täpp;
kena+A:ken tüüp_kena ;


LEXICON tüüp_ema
  +Sg+Nom: gi_lopp ;
  :%{NA%} sg_gen_jt ; 
  +Sg+Part:%> gi_lopp ;            
  +Pl:%>de semkäänded ;
  +Pl+Part:%>sid gi_lopp ;

LEXICON tüüp_kena
  +Sg+Nom:%>a gi_lopp ;
  :%{NA%}%>a sg_gen_jt ;
  +Sg+Part:%>a gi_lopp ;            
  +Pl:%>ade semkäänded ;
  +Pl+Part:%>asid gi_lopp ;
  +Der/im+A+Super:%>im tüüp_vidin ;

LEXICON tüüp_vidin
  +Sg+Nom: gi_lopp ;
  :a 2C; 

LEXICON tüüp_pere
  +Sg+Nom: gi_lopp ;
  :%{NA%} sg_gen_jt ; 
  +Sg+Part:%>t gi_lopp ;            
  +Pl:%>de semkäänded ;
  +Pl+Part:%>sid gi_lopp ;

LEXICON tüüp_täpp
  +Sg+Nom: gi_lopp ;
  :%{NA%}%>i sg_gen_jt ; 
  +Sg+Part:%>i gi_lopp ;            
  +Pl:%>ide semkäänded ;
  +Pl+Part:%>isid gi_lopp ;

LEXICON tüüp_käsi
  +Sg+Nom:%>i gi_lopp ;
  :%{NA%}%>e sg_gen_jt ;
  +Sg+Part:{NA%}%>tt gi_lopp ;
  +Pl:{NA%}%>te semkäänded ;
  +Pl+Part:%>i gi_lopp ;

LEXICON tüüp_tugi
	+Sg+Nom:%>i gi_lopp ;
	:%{NA%}%>e sg_gen_jt ;
	+Sg+Part:%>e gi_lopp ;
	+Pl:%>ede semkäänded ;
	+Pl+Part:%>esid gi_lopp ;

LEXICON 2C
  : sg_gen_jt ; 
  +Sg+Par:%>t gi_lopp ;
  +Pl:%>te semkäänded ;
  +Pl+Par:%>id gi_lopp ;

LEXICON sg_gen_jt

  +Sg+Gen: gi_lopp ;
  +Sg: semkäänded ;
  +Pl+Nom:%>d gi_lopp ;
  +Der/m+A+Comp:%>m tüüp_vidin ;
  +Der/lt+Adv:%>lt gi_lopp ;
  +Der/lik+A:%>lik gi_lopp ;
  

LEXICON gi_lopp
  +Rohk:%>GKi # ;
  : # ;
  

LEXICON semkäänded
    +Gen: gi_lopp ;
    +Ill:%>sse gi_lopp ;
    +In:%>s gi_lopp ;
    +El:%>st gi_lopp ;
    +All:%>le gi_lopp ;
    +Ad:%>l gi_lopp ;
    +Abl:%>lt gi_lopp ;
    +Tr:%>ks gi_lopp ;
    +Term:%>ni gi_lopp ;
    +Es:%>na gi_lopp ;
    +Abes:%>ta gi_lopp ;
    +Kom:%>ga gi_lopp ;
